Massachusetts, session 194th, H3739.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 33 of chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the 
thirty-seventh paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraphs:- 
(37) The registrar shall permit any person owing fees related to suspensions or 
revocations of any license or right to operate a motor vehicle - to enter into a monthly payment 
plan with the registrar to pay any fees related to the reinstatement of said license or right to 
operate a motor vehicle; provided, however, that the minimum monthly payment due shall be 
$25.00. The registrar may accept automatic monthly payments by credit or debit card on file with 
the registrar or payments made by check or money order received by mail or in person. Upon 
receipt of the first payment due on a monthly payment plan established pursuant to this 

of 2 10 paragraph the registrar may issue a conditional reinstatement of said license or right to operate a 
motor vehicle if the person is otherwise qualified to be granted said license or right to operate a 
motor vehicle. The registrar shall revoke a conditional reinstatement of a license or right to 
operate a motor vehicle if a required monthly payment is more than 30 days in arrears or for 
violation of any motor vehicle law listed in chapter 90 of the MGL. Upon payment in full of the 
fees owed, the registrar shall fully reinstate the license or right to operate a motor vehicle if the 
person is otherwise qualified to be granted said license or right to operate a motor vehicle. 
(38) For the registration of every street rod, replica vehicle, specially constructed vehicle 
or custom vehicle, as defined in section 2H consistent with the vehicle's intended use and the 
requirements of 540 CMR 2.05.